src/morphology/stems/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON Acronym   !!= * __@CODE@__ divides the acros in the 3 types just mentioned.
ABC ACRO ;
AD ACRO ;
ADSL ACRO ;
AFS ACRO ;
AMT ACRO ;
ANC ACRO ;
AP ACRO ;
AR ACRO ;
AS ACRO ;
ASS ACRO ;
ATSIC ACRO ;
AU ACRO ;
AV ACRO ;
AWG ACRO ;
AÁF ACRO ;
BB ACRO ;
BBL ACRO ;
BDF ACRO ;
BHD ACRO ;
BK ACRO ;
BNB ACRO ;
BOF ACRO ;
BONO ACRO ;
BSD ACRO ;
BST ACRO ;
BU ACRO ;
BUORIT ACRO ;
CBS ACRO ;
CD+Sem/Obj-el:CD ACRO ;
CIA ACRO ;
CO ACRO ;
CV ACRO ;
DAB ACRO ;
DAT ACRO ;
DD ACRO ;
DES ACRO ;
DGT ACRO ;
DIR ACRO ;
DKS ACRO ;
DLBS ACRO ;
DNA ACRO ;
DPS ACRO ;
DSE ACRO ;
DSI ACRO ;
DSK ACRO ;
DUS ACRO ;
DÁ ACRO ;
EAI ACRO ;
ED ACRO ;
EEK ACRO ;
EES ACRO ;
EG ACRO ;
EKG ACRO ;
EMM ACRO ;
ENA ACRO ;
EP ACRO ;
ERUF ACRO ;
ETA ACRO ;
EZLN ACRO ;
EØS ACRO ;
FAB ACRO ;
FAO ACRO ;
FC ACRO ;
FE ACRO ;
FFF ACRO ;
FGDL ACRO ;
FJ ACRO ;
FLL ACRO ;
FM ACRO ;
FN ACRO ;
FO ACRO ;
FS ACRO ;
FUOM ACRO ;
GB ACRO ;
GDL ACRO ;
GG ACRO ;
GHVS ACRO ;
GJ ACRO ;
GJSS ACRO ;
GLR ACRO ;
GOD ACRO ;
GPS ACRO ;
GSG ACRO ;
GSS ACRO ;
HB ACRO ;
HE ACRO ;
HFK ACRO ;
HK ACRO ;
HRW ACRO ;
HV ACRO ;
IBK ACRO ;
IBSS-NSR ACRO ;
ICES ACRO ;
IF ACRO ;
II ACRO ;
IIIA ACRO ;
IKT ACRO ;
ILAR ACRO ;
ILUS ACRO ;
IN ACRO ;
IPS ACRO ;
IRE ACRO ;
ISAN ACRO ;
ISDN ACRO ;
IV ACRO ;
IWGIA ACRO ;
JB ACRO ;
JK ACRO ;
JK2+MWE:JK2 ACRO ;
JOD ACRO ;
JPG ACRO ;
JSL ACRO ;
JUS ACRO ;
KBB ACRO ;
KF ACRO ;
KGD ACRO ;
KIM ACRO ;
KJJS ACRO ;
KKS ACRO ;
KLP ACRO ;
KPK ACRO ;
KRD ACRO ;
KSG	ACRO ;
KU ACRO ;
LA ACRO ;
LD ACRO ;
LEI ACRO ;
LKAB ACRO ;
LLH ACRO ;
LMS ACRO ;
LO ACRO ;
LSD ACRO ;
MAS ACRO ;
Mb ACRO ;
MBL ACRO ;
MD ACRO ;
MEGA ACRO ;
MGP ACRO ;
ML ACRO ;
MMI ACRO ;
MNP ACRO ;
MS ACRO ;
MSN ACRO ;
MuID ACRO;
MW ACRO ;
MÁ ACRO ;
NAF ACRO ;
NAV ACRO ;
NB ACRO ;
NBR-N ACRO ;
NCS ACRO ;
NGO ACRO ;
NHO ACRO ;
NIF ACRO ;
NINA ACRO ;
NJ ACRO ;
NKK ACRO ;
NLS ACRO ;
NMK ACRO ;
NN ACRO ;
NOK ACRO ;
NOR ACRO ;
NOS ACRO ;
NRK ACRO ;
MOSO ACRO ;
LDL ACRO ;
DKK ACRO ;
JOO ACRO ;
DOB ACRO ;
NSB ACRO ;
NSI ACRO ;
NSR-N ACRO ;
NTL ACRO ;
NU ACRO ;
neahtta-TV ACRO ;
riikka-TV ACRO ;
govdafierpmádat-TV:govda#fierpmádat-TV ACRO ;
govdafierpmádat-tv:govda#fierpmádat-tv ACRO ;
NČE ACRO ;
OB ACRO ;
ODD ACRO ;
OG ACRO ;
OHCAN ACRO ;
OK ACRO ;
OLU ACRO ;
ORO ACRO ;
OSL ACRO ;
OT ACRO ;
OVDAL ACRO ;
ovttas.no+Err/Orth:Ovttas.no ACRO ;
PGS ACRO ;
PB ACRO ;
PETA ACRO ;
PFL ACRO ;
PIL ACRO ;
PL ACRO ;
POOGP ACRO ;
PPB ACRO ;
PPS ACRO ;
PR ACRO ;
PUT ACRO ;
RAG ACRO ;
RBL ACRO ;
RDA ACRO ;
RMS ACRO ;
RO ACRO ;
RS ACRO ;
RSFSR ACRO ;
RSS ACRO ;
RV ACRO ;
Radisson-SAS ACRO ;
SAFE ACRO ;
SAP ACRO ;
SAÁO ACRO ;
SBB ACRO ;
SbS ACRO ;
SCA ACRO ;
SD ACRO ;
SDG ACRO ;
SDR ACRO ;
SE ACRO ;
SEG ACRO ;
SF ACRO ;
SFF ACRO ;
SFO ACRO ;
SFS ACRO ;
SG ACRO ;
SGP ACRO ;
SGRN ACRO ;
SGSBL ACRO ;
SIFI ACRO ;
SIVA ACRO ;
SJS ACRO ;
SK ACRO ;
SKINN ACRO ;
SKS ACRO ;
SL ACRO ;
SLČ ACRO ;
SMK ACRO ;
SN ACRO ;
SNF ACRO ;
SNO ACRO ;
SNPN ACRO ;
SOF ACRO ;
SOIF ACRO ;
SOR ACRO ;
SOU ACRO ;
SPOR ACRO ;
SPR-N ACRO ;
SRJ ACRO ;
SS ACRO ;
SSB ACRO ;
SSG ACRO ;
SSN ACRO ;
Sso ACRO ;
SSS ACRO ;
STIL ACRO ;
SUF ACRO ;
SV ACRO ;
SVF ACRO ;
SVL-N ACRO ;
SVT ACRO ;
SÁB ACRO ;
SÁNÁG ACRO ;
sámi-tv ACRO ;
NuorajTV+Err/Orth:Nuoraj9-tv ACRO ;
NuorajTV+Err/Orth:Nuoraj9% TV ACRO ;
NuorajTV+Err/Orth:Nuoraj9d9-tv ACRO ;
AC ACRO ;
MG ACRO ;
LDV ACRO ;
HRG ACRO ;
FWD ACRO ;
DKW ACRO ;
Diamond% T ACRO ;
SC ACRO ;
TCO ACRO ;
TIL ACRO ;
TONO ACRO ;
TSI ACRO ;
TT ACRO ;
UB ACRO ;
UDI ACRO ;
UEW ACRO ;
UN ACRO ;
UNEP ACRO ;
UNHCR ACRO ;
UNN ACRO ;
UNTAK ACRO ;
URACCAN ACRO ;
USA ACRO ;
UV ACRO ;
VG ACRO ;
VII ACRO ;
VM ACRO ;
VR ACRO ;
VUK ACRO ;
VW ACRO ;
WCIP ACRO ;
WINHEC ACRO ;
WIVC ACRO ;
WSOY ACRO ;
WWA ACRO ;
WWM ACRO ;
YEH ACRO ;
YSS ACRO ;
duolba-TV+Sem/Obj-el:duolba-TV ACRO ;
juovla-CD ACRO ;
sálbma-CD ACRO ;
oahppo-cd ACRO ;
duolba-tv+Sem/Obj-el:duolva-tv ACRO ;
juovla-cd ACRO ;
sámemánáid-tv+v2:sáme#mánáid9-TV ACRO ;
sálbma-cd ACRO ;
ÅT ACRO ;
ČSV ACRO ;
LEXICON LETTERNUMBER   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains a list of letters and numbers
A4 ACRO ;
3G ACRO ;
CO2 ACRO ;
VK2 ACRO ;
A3 ACRO ;
4-A ACRO ;
5-G ACRO ;
1-D ACRO ;
6-B ACRO ;
A/L ACRO ;
ECHAM/OPYC3 ACRO ;
LU1 ACRO ;
K/S ACRO ;
S/S ACRO ;
O97S ACRO ;
Jo1+MWE:Jo1 ACRO ;
Jo3+MWE:Jo3 ACRO ;
Bb ACRO ;
Jk1 ACRO ;
NRK2 ACRO ;
U19 ACRO ;
U23 ACRO ;
E6 ACRO ;
L97S ACRO ;
O-97 ACRO ;
P1 ACRO ;
HLA-B27 ACRO ;
P2 ACRO ;
P4 ACRO ;
P-2 ACRO ;
P-4 ACRO ;
XLV54%0 ACRO ;
8%0%0R ACRO ;
km/t ACRO ;
km/h ACRO ;
SVT1 ACRO ;
SVT24 ACRO ;
UU2 ACRO ;
rev.buš-%01:rev.buš-%01 ACRO ;
rev.buš-%03:rev.buš-%03 ACRO ;
rev.buš-%05:rev.buš-%05 ACRO ;
rev.buš-%07:rev.buš-%07 ACRO ;
rev.buš-%09:rev.buš-%09 ACRO ;
rev.buš-11 ACRO ;
rev.buš-13 ACRO ;
rev.buš-15 ACRO ;
LEXICON smallacro   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains acros with small letters
BbNS ACRO ;
CCITT:CCITT ACRO ;
as+CmpNP/None:as ACRO ; !A/S
cd+Sem/Obj-el:cd ACRO ;
tv+Sem/Obj-el:tv ACRO ;
mánáid-tv+v1:mánáid9-tv ACRO ;
teaksta-tv ACRO ;
SamIT ACRO ;
AciA ACRO ;
Art ACRO ;
BfS ACRO ;
KrF ACRO ;
bh ACRO ;
dna ACRO ;
html ACRO ;
iOS ACRO ;
mc ACRO ;
mvh ACRO ;
nsr ACRO ;
ph ACRO ;
pms ACRO ;
sff ACRO ;
svs ACRO ;
vgs ACRO ;
wcip ACRO ;
xhtml ACRO ;
DnB ACRO ;
Dssn:Dssn9 ACRO ;
EtMk ACRO ;
pps UNIT ;
ekg UNIT ;
kB UNIT ;
Rv UNIT ;
kVA UNIT ;
FBb ACRO ;
FeFo ACRO;
FGb ACRO ;
FoU ACRO ;
Frp+Err/Orth:FrP ACRO ;
Dsj ACRO ;
Gb ACRO ; !Guovddášbellodat
Gwh UNIT ;
HadCM ACRO ;
TWh UNIT ;
Sgb ACRO ;
Ji ACRO ;
SGb ACRO ; !Sosialisttalaš gurutbellodat
KiMK ACRO ;
KoKS ACRO ;
KrÁ ACRO ;
ráđđehus.no+Err/Lex:ráđđehus.no ACRO ; ! Why sub?
Infonuorra.no+Err/Lex:Infonuorra.no ACRO ;
risten.no+Err/Orth:Risten.no ACRO ;
LaMk ACRO ;
LuW ACRO ;
NgL ACRO ;
Rp:Rp9 ACRO ;
pH ACRO ;
Sf ACRO ;
sfo ACRO ;
DuÅ ACRO ;
SfF ACRO ;
SfP ACRO ;
SáB ACRO ;
SvJT ACRO ;
UiO ACRO ;
Tromsa-OL ACRO ;
SkL ACRO ;
Aut ACRO ;
Bq UNIT ;
GWh UNIT ;
Geađgenjár UNIT ; !Geađgenjárga
Hz UNIT ;
Kbh UNIT ;
MHz UNIT ;
Mellomvn UNIT ;
Od:Od9 UNIT ; !Odelstinget
Rg UNIT ;
RáB ACRO ; !Kristelig folkeparti, KrF
Savkadasv UNIT ; !Savkadasveien
Searvg.ped:Searvg.ped9 UNIT ;
Slalomvn UNIT ;
alii UNIT ;
bear UNIT ; !Bearjadat
bfr UNIT ; !
borg:borg9 UNIT ;
can$+Use/Circ:can$ UNIT ; ! !
cg UNIT ; !
cl UNIT ; !
cm UNIT ; !
cm3 UNIT ;
co2 UNIT ;
cos UNIT ; !
cot UNIT ; !
cuoŋ UNIT ;
dB UNIT ; !
daa UNIT ; !
dg UNIT ; !
dl UNIT ; !
dm2 UNIT ;
dm3 UNIT ;
dm:dm9 UNIT ; !desimehtar
dmu UNIT ; !diibmu
dm² UNIT ;
dm³ UNIT ;
duor UNIT ; !Duorastat
esc UNIT ;
fob:fob9 UNIT ;
gask:gask9 UNIT ; !gaskavahkku
golg:golg9 UNIT ; !
guov UNIT ; !
ha UNIT ;
hg UNIT ; !
hl UNIT ; !
id:id9 UNIT ;
ie UNIT ;
iežaskap:iežaskap9 UNIT ;
info UNIT ;
jk1 UNIT ;
jk2 UNIT ;
jr UNIT ;
juov UNIT ;
kHz UNIT ; !
kV UNIT ;
kW UNIT ;
kWh UNIT ;
kb UNIT ; !kilobyte
kb/s UNIT ; !kilobytes per second
kg UNIT ;
km UNIT ;
km2 UNIT ;
km3 UNIT ;
km² UNIT ;
km³ UNIT ;
kvm UNIT ;
lc UNIT ;
lix ACRO ;
láv UNIT ; !Lávvardat
m/s UNIT ;
m2 UNIT ;
m3 UNIT ;
mV UNIT ;
mW UNIT ;
maŋ UNIT ; !máŋŋebárga
mg UNIT ;
mies UNIT ; !
mm UNIT ;
mm2 UNIT ;
mm3 UNIT ;
mm² UNIT ;
mm³ UNIT ;
mod:mod9 UNIT ;
mp UNIT ;
m² UNIT ;
m³ UNIT ;
mán UNIT ; !mánnodat
njuk UNIT ; !
ođđj UNIT ;
pH UNIT ;
ps UNIT ;
pta UNIT ;
pvc UNIT ;
rbl UNIT ;
sch UNIT ;
sfr UNIT ;
skáb:skáb9 UNIT ; !Skábmamánnu
sotn UNIT ; !Sotnabeaivi
suoi UNIT ; !Suoidnemánnu
tme UNIT ;
vt UNIT ;
wo UNIT ;
yd:yd9 UNIT ;
čakč UNIT ; !
